Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE H. RESEARCH IN HIGHER EDUCATION

CHAPTER 141. RESEARCH ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM

Sec. 141.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, or its successor.

(2) "Enhancement program" means the research enhancement program established under this chapter.

(3) "Faculty member" means a person who is tenured or is in a tenure track position and is employed by a public senior college or university.

(4) "Public senior college or university" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003(4) of this code.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.08, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 141.002. ESTABLISHMENT; PURPOSE. The research enhancement program is established to encourage and provide support for research conducted by faculty members. The program replaces the research program that currently is referred to as "Organized Research."

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.08, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 141.003. FUNDING. (a) The research enhancement program is funded by legislative appropriations. A public senior college or university may receive gifts, grants, and donations to augment legislative appropriations.

(b) The legislature shall appropriate money for the enhancement program to each public senior college or university using a formula developed by the coordinating board that is based on the number of full-time faculty members, or the equivalent, at each public senior college or university, as determined by the coordinating board.

(c) Supplies, materials, services, and equipment purchased with these funds shall not be subject to the purchasing authority of the comptroller.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.08, eff. June 20, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.87, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 141.004. GUIDELINES AND PROCEDURES. Each public senior college or university that receives funds under this chapter shall:

(1) develop guidelines and procedures to use in selecting the research projects to be funded;

(2) appoint a faculty committee to review research proposals submitted for consideration and to select the projects to be funded using the guidelines and procedures developed under this section; and

(3) provide for awards on a competitive basis.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.08, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 141.005. MERIT REVIEW. The coordinating board shall appoint a committee that consists of higher education representatives to evaluate the enhancement program's effectiveness and shall report its findings to the coordinating board not later than September 1 of the second year of each biennium.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 823, Sec. 3.08, eff. June 20, 1987.